test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_E.E_STEM_3.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_E.E_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_E.E_STEM_3

     ñe.e+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñe.ée
     ñe.e+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñe.ée
     ñe.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñe.ée
     ñe.e+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñe.éeng
     ñe.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñe.éeyaa
     ñe.e+V+INDIRECT+PAST: ñe.éeyaan
     ñe.e+V+RELATIVE: ñe.ées
     ñe.e+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñe.éeyaas
     ñe.e+V+NON_FACTIVE: ñe.ée.ang
     ñe.e+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñe.éeyaa.ang
     ñe.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñe.éeäsaa
     ñe.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñe.éeäs
     ñe.e+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñe.éeäsaang
     ñe.e+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñe.éeäsga
     ñe.e+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñe.éeäsaas
     ñe.e+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñe.éeäsaa.ang
     ñe.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasa'áa
     ñe.e+V+NEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasa'áang
     ñe.e+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasaasdláa
     ñe.e+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasaasdláang
     ñe.e+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñe.ée'uuj
     ñe.e+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñe.ée'uujang
     ñe.e+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñe.éeäsaa'uujang
     ñe.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñe.ée'us
     ñe.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñe.ée'ujaa
     ñe.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñe.ée'uujaangaa
     ñe.e+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñe.éeäsaa'us
     ñe.e+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñe.ée'ahlanggang
     ñe.e+V+CERTAIN+PAST: ñe.ée'ahlanggan
     ñe.e+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñe.ée'ahlanggiinii
     ñe.e+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñe.éeäsaa'ahlans
     ñe.e+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñe.ée'ahlans
     ñe.e+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñe.éeyaa'ahlang
     ñe.e+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñe.éeyaa'ahlanggaa
     ñe.e+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñe.éeyaa'ahlanggang
     ñe.e+V+REFLEXIVE: ñe.ée'ahl
     ñe.e+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñe.éeäseehl
     ñe.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasaa'áng
     ñe.e+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñe.e+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñe.e+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñe.ée.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
